Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2061.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma Food
Policy Council Act”.


ENGR. S. B. NO. 2061 Page 1

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5-3.6 of Title 2, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:
1. “Community garden” means any land cultivated by individuals
or groups for production of food for personal or local use or
community benefit;
2. “Farmers hub” means a facility, organization, or coordinated
network that supports the handling, storage, processing, or
distribution of agricultural products produced by multiple farmers
or producers;
3. “Local food” means food produced, grown, or processed within
this state; and
4. “Sustainable food” means an integrated food system that
supports economic viability for farmers or producers, protects
natural resources, enhances efficient use of land and water, and
promotes accessibility to safe and nutritious food.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5-3.7 of Title 2, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created the Oklahoma Food Policy Council
within the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry.
B. The Council shall consist of eleven (11) members:
1. The Governor shall appoint three members as follows:
ENGR. S. B. NO. 2061 Page 2

a. one member representing the Farm to School program who
shall serve an initial term of one (1) year,
b. one member representing local and county food security
initiatives who shall serve an initial term of two (2)
years, and
c. one member representing the State Department of Health
who shall serve an initial term of three (3) years;
2. The President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall appoint four
members as follows:
a. one member from the Food Safety Division of the
Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry
who shall serve an initial term of one (1) year,
b one member from Langston University Cooperative
Extension Service who shall serve an initial term of
one (1) year,
c. one member who is an agricultural producer within this
state who shall serve an initial term of two (2)
years, and
d. one member representing conservation and sustainable
agricultural practices who shall serve an initial term
of three (3) years;
3. The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint
four members as follows:

ENGR. S. B. NO. 2061 Page 3

a. one member from a food bank within this state who
shall serve an initial term of one (1) year,
b one member from Oklahoma State University Cooperative
Extension Service who shall serve an initial term of
one (1) year,
c. one member representing local food distribution and
local food supply chains who shall serve an initial
term of two (2) years, and
d. one member representing the Agricultural Environmental
Management Division of the Oklahoma Department of
Agriculture, Food, and Forestry who shall serve an
initial term of three (3) years;
4. Members appointed to the Council shall serve staggered terms
of three (3) years, and after the initial appointment, each term
shall be for three (3) years; and
5. Any vacancy on the Council resulting from the resignation of
a member or otherwise shall be filled in the same manner as the
original appointment was made and the term shall be for the amount
of time of the unexpired term of the member who created the vacancy.
C. The Council shall elect from among its members a chair, vice
chair, and any other officers that the Council deems necessary.
D. The Council shall meet at least four (4) times per year or
as the chair deems necessary and shall comply with the Oklahoma Open
Meeting Act and the Oklahoma Open Records Act.
ENGR. S. B. NO. 2061 Page 4

E. The Council members shall receive no compensation for
serving on the Council but shall be eligible for reimbursement of
travel expenses incurred pursuant to the State Travel Reimbursement
Act.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5-3.8 of Title 2, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Food Policy Council shall serve in a solely
advisory and coordinating capacity and shall:
1. Create networks of farmers to local organizations to provide
sustainable locally grown food to consumers throughout this state;
2. Strengthen coordination between existing programs that
support sustainable food production, farm-to-schools initiatives,
and producer-to-consumer access;
3. Assess the impact of the production of sustainable food
distributed locally on the economic development of the state,
enhancing the use of locally produced food for use in restaurants,
retail, and agritourism;
4. Assess the utilization of urban gardens and community
gardens for the purpose of improving the health of citizens, and
allowing for the use of urban property; and
5. Connect producers of sustainable food to farmers markets in
the state.

ENGR. S. B. NO. 2061 Page 5

B. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry
may coordinate with the Council to identify any existing farmers
hubs, and promote collaboration between producers, community
gardens, local food banks or organizations, and local governments to
share best practices and resources to support the distribution of
sustainable food.
C. The Council shall electronically submit an annual report to
the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the
Speaker of the House of Representatives with any recommendations and
a summary of its findings. The annual report shall be published on
the website of the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and
Forestry beginning one (1) year after the effective date of this
act.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
Passed the Senate the 25th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

ENGR. S. B. NO. 2061 Page 6